New York, session 2025-2026, S2451.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Short title. This act shall be known and may be cited as 2 the "senior citizens rent increase exemption (SCRIE) and disability rent 3 increase exemption (DRIE) rollback act". 4 § 2. Subdivision 4 of section 467-b of the real property tax law is 5 amended by adding a new paragraph c to read as follows: 6 c. Provided, however, that if provided by the local law, ordinance or 7 resolution adopted pursuant to this section, a tax abatement certificate 8 setting forth an amount equal to the amount by which the maximum rent or 9 legal regulated rent of the subsequent dwelling unit exceeds one-third 10 of the combined income of all members of the household for the taxable 11 period shall be issued by said agency to each head of household who is 12 found to be eligible under this section and upon application to the 13 appropriate rent control agency or administrative agency on a form 14 prescribed by said agency on or before the last date prescribed by law 15 for the payment of the taxes or the first installment therefor of any 16 municipal corporation which has granted an abatement of taxes. Copies of 17 such certificate shall be issued to the owner of the real property 18 containing the dwelling unit of the head of the household and to the 19 collecting officer charged with the duty of collecting the taxes or each 20 municipal corporation which has granted the abatement of taxes author- 21 ized by this section. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00073-04-5 S. 2451--A 2 1 § 3. Subdivision (a) of section 26-605 of the administrative code of 2 the city of New York, as amended by local law number 98 of the city of 3 New York for the year 1985 and paragraph 3 as added by chapter 553 of 4 the laws of 2015, is amended to read as follows: 5 (a) Subject to the provisions of this chapter and if provided by the 6 local law, ordinance or resolution adopted pursuant to this section, an 7 eligible head of the household may obtain a rent increase exemption 8 order/tax abatement certificate entitling [him or her] such head of the 9 household to an exemption from increases in the maximum rent equal to 10 the amount by which the maximum rent or legal regulated rent of the 11 subsequent dwelling unit exceeds one-third of the combined income of all 12 members of the household otherwise payable in one of the following 13 amounts: 14 (1) where the eligible head of the household does not receive a month- 15 ly allowance for shelter pursuant to the social services law, the amount 16 by which increases in the maximum rent subsequent to such persons' 17 eligibility date have resulted in the maximum rent exceeding one-third 18 of the combined income of all members of the household for the taxable 19 period, except that in no event shall a rent increase exemption order 20 tax abatement certificate become effective prior to January first, nine- 21 teen hundred seventy-six; or 22 (2) where the eligible head of the household receives a monthly allow- 23 ance for shelter pursuant to the social services law, an amount not 24 exceeding that portion of any increase in maximum rent subsequent to 25 such person's eligibility date which is not covered by the maximum 26 allowance for shelter which such person is entitled to receive pursuant 27 to the social services law. 28 [(3) notwithstanding paragraph one of this subdivision, where the 29 eligible head of the household is a person who qualifies as a person 30 with a disability pursuant to section 26-617 of this chapter and who has 31 been granted a rent increase exemption order that is in effect as of 32 January first, two thousand fifteen or takes effect on or before July 33 first, two thousand fifteen, the amount specified in such order, as 34 adjusted by any other provision of this chapter, regardless of whether 35 increases in the maximum rent subsequent to such persons' eligibility 36 date have resulted in the maximum rent exceeding one-third of the 37 combined income of all members of the household for the taxable period.] 38 § 4. Item (a) of subparagraph (i) of paragraph 3 of subdivision b of 39 section 26-509 of the administrative code of the city of New York, as 40 amended by local law number 98 of the city of New York for the year 41 1985, is amended to read as follows: 42 (a) in the case of a head of the household who does not receive a 43 monthly allowance for shelter pursuant to the social services law, that 44 the landlord may not collect from the tenant to whom it is issued rent 45 at a rate in excess of [either] one-third of the aggregate disposable 46 income[, or the rent in effect immediately preceding the eligibility 47 date, whichever is greater]; or 48 § 5. This act shall take effect immediately; provided that the amend- 49 ments to section 26-509 of chapter 4 of title 26 of the administrative 50 code of the city of New York made by section four of this act shall 51 expire on the same date as such law expires and shall not affect the 52 expiration of such law as provided under section 26-520 of such law.